Ohio, session 136, HB468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4511.01 of the Revised Code be 6
amended to read as follows: 7
Sec. 4511.01. As used in this chapter and in Chapter 4513. 8
of the Revised Code: 9
(A) "Vehicle" means every device, including a motorized 10
bicycle and an electric bicycle, in, upon, or by which any 11
person or property may be transported or drawn upon a highway, 12
except that "vehicle" does not include any motorized wheelchair, 13
any electric personal assistive mobility device, any low-speed 14
micromobility device, any personal delivery device as defined in 15
section 4511.513 of the Revised Code, any device that is moved 16
by power collected from overhead electric trolley wires or that 17
is used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks, or any 18

H. B. No. 468 Page 2
As Introduced
device, other than a bicycle, that is moved by human power. 19
(B) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle propelled or drawn 20
by power other than muscular power or power collected from 21
overhead electric trolley wires, except motorized bicycles, 22
electric bicycles, road rollers, traction engines, power 23
shovels, power cranes, and other equipment used in construction 24
work and not designed for or employed in general highway 25
transportation, hole-digging machinery, well-drilling machinery, 26
ditch-digging machinery, farm machinery, and trailers designed 27
and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of 28
storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or 29
towed on a street or highway for a distance of no more than ten 30
miles and at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less. 31
(C) "Motorcycle" means every motor vehicle, other than a 32
tractor, having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator and 33
designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with 34
the ground, including, but not limited to, motor vehicles known 35
as "motor-driven cycle," "motor scooter," "autocycle," "cab- 36
enclosed motorcycle," or "motorcycle" without regard to weight 37
or brake horsepower. 38
(D) "Emergency vehicle" means emergency vehicles of 39
municipal, township, or county departments or public utility 40
corporations when identified as such as required by law, the 41
director of public safety, or local authorities, and motor 42
vehicles when commandeered by a police officer. 43
(E) "Public safety vehicle" means any of the following: 44
(1) Ambulances, including private ambulance companies 45
under contract to a municipal corporation, township, or county, 46
and private ambulances and nontransport vehicles bearing license 47

H. B. No. 468 Page 3
As Introduced
plates issued under section 4503.49 of the Revised Code; 48
(2) Motor vehicles used by public law enforcement officers 49
or other persons sworn to enforce the criminal and traffic laws 50
of the state; 51
(3) Any motor vehicle when properly identified as required 52
by the director of public safety, when used in response to fire 53
emergency calls or to provide emergency medical service to ill 54
or injured persons, and when operated by a duly qualified person 55
who is a member of a volunteer rescue service or a volunteer 56
fire department, and who is on duty pursuant to the rules or 57
directives of that service. The state fire marshal shall be 58
designated by the director of public safety as the certifying 59
agency for all public safety vehicles described in division (E) 60
(3) of this section. 61
(4) Vehicles used by fire departments, including motor 62
vehicles when used by volunteer fire fighters responding to 63
emergency calls in the fire department service when identified 64
as required by the director of public safety. 65
Any vehicle used to transport or provide emergency medical 66
service to an ill or injured person, when certified as a public 67
safety vehicle, shall be considered a public safety vehicle when 68
transporting an ill or injured person to a hospital regardless 69
of whether such vehicle has already passed a hospital. 70
(5) Vehicles used by the motor carrier enforcement unit 71
for the enforcement of orders and rules of the public utilities 72
commission as specified in section 5503.34 of the Revised Code; 73
(6) Vehicles used by the public utilities commission's 74
hazardous materials transportation enforcement section for the 75
enforcement of orders and rules of the public utilities 76

H. B. No. 468 Page 4
As Introduced
commission or when responding to hazardous material emergencies; 77
(7) Vehicles used by the environmental protection agency 78
environmental emergency response unit when responding to 79
hazardous material emergencies or other pollution incidents that 80
affect human health or the environment. 81
(F) "School bus" means every bus designed for carrying 82
more than nine passengers that is owned by a public, private, or 83
governmental agency or institution of learning and operated for 84
the transportation of children to or from a school session or a 85
school function, or owned by a private person and operated for 86
compensation for the transportation of children to or from a 87
school session or a school function, provided "school bus" does 88
not include a bus operated by a municipally owned transportation 89
system, a mass transit company operating exclusively within the 90
territorial limits of a municipal corporation, or within such 91
limits and the territorial limits of municipal corporations 92
immediately contiguous to such municipal corporation, nor a 93
common passenger carrier certified by the public utilities 94
commission unless such bus is devoted exclusively to the 95
transportation of children to and from a school session or a 96
school function, and "school bus" does not include a van or bus 97
used by a licensed child care center or type A family child care 98
home to transport children from the child care center or type A 99
family child care home to a school if the van or bus does not 100
have more than fifteen children in the van or bus at any time. 101
(G) "Bicycle" means every device, other than a device that 102
is designed solely for use as a play vehicle by a child, that is 103
propelled solely by human power upon which a person may ride, 104
and that has two or more wheels, any of which is more than 105
fourteen inches in diameter. 106

H. B. No. 468 Page 5
As Introduced
(H) "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" means any vehicle 107
having either two tandem wheels or one wheel in the front and 108
two wheels in the rear, that may be pedaled, and that is 109
equipped with a helper motor of not more than fifty cubic 110
centimeters piston displacement that produces not more than one 111
brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a 112
speed of not greater than twenty miles per hour on a level 113
surface. "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" does not include an 114
electric bicycle. 115
(I) "Commercial tractor" means every motor vehicle having 116
motive power designed or used for drawing other vehicles and not 117
so constructed as to carry any load thereon, or designed or used 118
for drawing other vehicles while carrying a portion of such 119
other vehicles, or load thereon, or both. 120
(J) "Agricultural tractor" means every self-propelling 121
vehicle designed or used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled 122
machinery but having no provision for carrying loads 123
independently of such other vehicles, and used principally for 124
agricultural purposes. 125
(K) "Truck" means every motor vehicle, except trailers and 126
semitrailers, designed and used to carry property. 127
(L) "Bus" means every motor vehicle designed for carrying 128
more than nine passengers and used for the transportation of 129
persons other than in a ridesharing arrangement, and every motor 130
vehicle, automobile for hire, or funeral car, other than a 131
taxicab or motor vehicle used in a ridesharing arrangement, 132
designed and used for the transportation of persons for 133
compensation. 134
(M) "Trailer" means every vehicle designed or used for 135

H. B. No. 468 Page 6
As Introduced
carrying persons or property wholly on its own structure and for 136
being drawn by a motor vehicle, including any such vehicle when 137
formed by or operated as a combination of a "semitrailer" and a 138
vehicle of the dolly type, such as that commonly known as a 139
"trailer dolly," a vehicle used to transport agricultural 140
produce or agricultural production materials between a local 141
place of storage or supply and the farm when drawn or towed on a 142
street or highway at a speed greater than twenty-five miles per 143
hour, and a vehicle designed and used exclusively to transport a 144
boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a 145
marina, when drawn or towed on a street or highway for a 146
distance of more than ten miles or at a speed of more than 147
twenty-five miles per hour. 148
(N) "Semitrailer" means every vehicle designed or used for 149
carrying persons or property with another and separate motor 150
vehicle so that in operation a part of its own weight or that of 151
its load, or both, rests upon and is carried by another vehicle. 152
(O) "Pole trailer" means every trailer or semitrailer 153
attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach, pole, or by 154
being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle, and 155
ordinarily used for transporting long or irregular shaped loads 156
such as poles, pipes, or structural members capable, generally, 157
of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting 158
connections. 159
(P) "Railroad" means a carrier of persons or property 160
operating upon rails placed principally on a private right-of- 161
way. 162
(Q) "Railroad train" means a steam engine or an electric 163
or other motor, with or without cars coupled thereto, operated 164
by a railroad. 165

H. B. No. 468 Page 7
As Introduced
(R) "Streetcar" means a car, other than a railroad train, 166
for transporting persons or property, operated upon rails 167
principally within a street or highway. 168
(S) "Trackless trolley" means every car that collects its 169
power from overhead electric trolley wires and that is not 170
operated upon rails or tracks. 171
(T) "Explosives" means any chemical compound or mechanical 172
mixture that is intended for the purpose of producing an 173
explosion that contains any oxidizing and combustible units or 174
other ingredients in such proportions, quantities, or packing 175
that an ignition by fire, by friction, by concussion, by 176
percussion, or by a detonator of any part of the compound or 177
mixture may cause such a sudden generation of highly heated 178
gases that the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of 179
producing destructive effects on contiguous objects, or of 180
destroying life or limb. Manufactured articles shall not be held 181
to be explosives when the individual units contain explosives in 182
such limited quantities, of such nature, or in such packing, 183
that it is impossible to procure a simultaneous or a destructive 184
explosion of such units, to the injury of life, limb, or 185
property by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or 186
by a detonator, such as fixed ammunition for small arms, 187
firecrackers, or safety fuse matches. 188
(U) "Flammable liquid" means any liquid that has a flash 189
point of seventy degrees fahrenheit, or less, as determined by a 190
tagliabue or equivalent closed cup test device. 191
(V) "Gross weight" means the weight of a vehicle plus the 192
weight of any load thereon. 193
(W) "Person" means every natural person, firm, co- 194

H. B. No. 468 Page 8
As Introduced
partnership, association, or corporation. 195
(X) "Pedestrian" means any natural person afoot. 196
"Pedestrian" includes a personal delivery device as defined in 197
section 4511.513 of the Revised Code unless the context clearly 198
suggests otherwise. 199
(Y) "Driver or operator" means every person who drives or 200
is in actual physical control of a vehicle, trackless trolley, 201
or streetcar. 202
(Z) "Police officer" means every officer authorized to 203
direct or regulate traffic, or to make arrests for violations of 204
traffic regulations. 205
(AA) "Local authorities" means every county, municipal, 206
and other local board or body having authority to adopt police 207
regulations under the constitution and laws of this state. 208
(BB) "Street" or "highway" means the entire width between 209
the boundary lines of every way open to the use of the public as 210
a thoroughfare for purposes of vehicular travel. 211
(CC) "Controlled-access highway" means every street or 212
highway in respect to which owners or occupants of abutting 213
lands and other persons have no legal right of access to or from 214
the same except at such points only and in such manner as may be 215
determined by the public authority having jurisdiction over such 216
street or highway. 217
(DD) "Private road or driveway" means every way or place 218
in private ownership used for vehicular travel by the owner and 219
those having express or implied permission from the owner but 220
not by other persons. 221
(EE) "Roadway" means that portion of a highway improved, 222

H. B. No. 468 Page 9
As Introduced
designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel, except the 223
berm or shoulder. If a highway includes two or more separate 224
roadways the term "roadway" means any such roadway separately 225
but not all such roadways collectively. 226
(FF) "Sidewalk" means that portion of a street between the 227
curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent 228
property lines, intended for the use of pedestrians. 229
(GG) "Laned highway" means a highway the roadway of which 230
is divided into two or more clearly marked lanes for vehicular 231
traffic. 232
(HH) "Through highway" means every street or highway as 233
provided in section 4511.65 of the Revised Code. 234
(II) "State highway" means a highway under the 235
jurisdiction of the department of transportation, outside the 236
limits of municipal corporations, provided that the authority 237
conferred upon the director of transportation in section 5511.01 238
of the Revised Code to erect state highway route markers and 239
signs directing traffic shall not be modified by sections 240
4511.01 to 4511.79 and 4511.99 of the Revised Code. 241
(JJ) "State route" means every highway that is designated 242
with an official state route number and so marked. 243
(KK) "Intersection" means: 244
(1) The area embraced within the prolongation or 245
connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, the lateral 246
boundary lines of the roadways of two highways that join one 247
another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the area 248
within which vehicles traveling upon different highways that 249
join at any other angle might come into conflict. The junction 250
of an alley or driveway with a roadway or highway does not 251

H. B. No. 468 Page 10
As Introduced
constitute an intersection unless the roadway or highway at the 252
junction is controlled by a traffic control device. 253
(2) If a highway includes two roadways that are thirty 254
feet or more apart, then every crossing of each roadway of such 255
divided highway by an intersecting highway constitutes a 256
separate intersection. If both intersecting highways include two 257
roadways thirty feet or more apart, then every crossing of any 258
two roadways of such highways constitutes a separate 259
intersection. 260
(3) At a location controlled by a traffic control signal, 261
regardless of the distance between the separate intersections as 262
described in division (KK)(2) of this section: 263
(a) If a stop line, yield line, or crosswalk has not been 264
designated on the roadway within the median between the separate 265
intersections, the two intersections and the roadway and median 266
constitute one intersection. 267
(b) Where a stop line, yield line, or crosswalk line is 268
designated on the roadway on the intersection approach, the area 269
within the crosswalk and any area beyond the designated stop 270
line or yield line constitute part of the intersection. 271
(c) Where a crosswalk is designated on a roadway on the 272
departure from the intersection, the intersection includes the 273
area that extends to the far side of the crosswalk. 274
(LL) "Crosswalk" means: 275
(1) That part of a roadway at intersections ordinarily 276
included within the real or projected prolongation of property 277
lines and curb lines or, in the absence of curbs, the edges of 278
the traversable roadway; 279

H. B. No. 468 Page 11
As Introduced
(2) Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or 280
elsewhere, distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines 281
or other markings on the surface; 282
(3) Notwithstanding divisions (LL)(1) and (2) of this 283
section, there shall not be a crosswalk where local authorities 284
have placed signs indicating no crossing. 285
(MM) "Safety zone" means the area or space officially set 286
apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and 287
protected or marked or indicated by adequate signs as to be 288
plainly visible at all times. 289
(NN) "Business district" means the territory fronting upon 290
a street or highway, including the street or highway, between 291
successive intersections within municipal corporations where 292
fifty per cent or more of the frontage between such successive 293
intersections is occupied by buildings in use for business, or 294
within or outside municipal corporations where fifty per cent or 295
more of the frontage for a distance of three hundred feet or 296
more is occupied by buildings in use for business, and the 297
character of such territory is indicated by official traffic 298
control devices. 299
(OO) "Residence district" means the territory, not 300
comprising a business district, fronting on a street or highway, 301
including the street or highway, where, for a distance of three 302
hundred feet or more, the frontage is improved with residences 303
or residences and buildings in use for business. 304
(PP) "Urban district" means the territory contiguous to 305
and including any street or highway which is built up with 306
structures devoted to business, industry, or dwelling houses 307
situated at intervals of less than one hundred feet for a 308

H. B. No. 468 Page 12
As Introduced
distance of a quarter of a mile or more, and the character of 309
such territory is indicated by official traffic control devices. 310
(QQ) "Traffic control device" means a flagger, sign, 311
signal, marking, or other device used to regulate, warn, or 312
guide traffic, placed on, over, or adjacent to a street, 313
highway, private road open to public travel, pedestrian 314
facility, or shared-use path by authority of a public agency or 315
official having jurisdiction, or, in the case of a private road 316
open to public travel, by authority of the private owner or 317
private official having jurisdiction. 318
(RR) "Traffic control signal" means any highway traffic 319
signal by which traffic is alternately directed to stop and 320
permitted to proceed. 321
(SS) "Railroad sign or signal" means any sign, signal, or 322
device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a 323
railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad 324
tracks or the approach of a railroad train. 325
(TT) "Traffic" means pedestrians, ridden or herded 326
animals, vehicles, streetcars, trackless trolleys, and other 327
devices, either singly or together, while using for purposes of 328
travel any highway or private road open to public travel. 329
(UU) "Right-of-way" means either of the following, as the 330
context requires: 331
(1) The right of a vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, 332
or pedestrian to proceed uninterruptedly in a lawful manner in 333
the direction in which it or the individual is moving in 334
preference to another vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, or 335
pedestrian approaching from a different direction into its or 336
the individual's path; 337

H. B. No. 468 Page 13
As Introduced
(2) A general term denoting land, property, or the 338
interest therein, usually in the configuration of a strip, 339
acquired for or devoted to transportation purposes. When used in 340
this context, right-of-way includes the roadway, shoulders or 341
berm, ditch, and slopes extending to the right-of-way limits 342
under the control of the state or local authority. 343
(VV) "Rural mail delivery vehicle" means every vehicle 344
used to deliver United States mail on a rural mail delivery 345
route. 346
(WW) "Funeral escort vehicle" means any motor vehicle, 347
including a funeral hearse, while used to facilitate the 348
movement of a funeral procession. 349
(XX) "Alley" means a street or highway intended to provide 350
access to the rear or side of lots or buildings in urban 351
districts and not intended for the purpose of through vehicular 352
traffic, and includes any street or highway that has been 353
declared an "alley" by the legislative authority of the 354
municipal corporation in which such street or highway is 355
located. 356
(YY) "Freeway" means a divided multi-lane highway for 357
through traffic with all crossroads separated in grade and with 358
full control of access. 359
(ZZ) "Expressway" means a divided arterial highway for 360
through traffic with full or partial control of access with an 361
excess of fifty per cent of all crossroads separated in grade. 362
(AAA) "Thruway" means a through highway whose entire 363
roadway is reserved for through traffic and on which roadway 364
parking is prohibited. 365
(BBB) "Stop intersection" means any intersection at one or 366

H. B. No. 468 Page 14
As Introduced
more entrances of which stop signs are erected. 367
(CCC) "Arterial street" means any United States or state 368
numbered route, controlled access highway, or other major radial 369
or circumferential street or highway designated by local 370
authorities within their respective jurisdictions as part of a 371
major arterial system of streets or highways. 372
(DDD) "Ridesharing arrangement" means the transportation 373
of persons in a motor vehicle where such transportation is 374
incidental to another purpose of a volunteer driver and includes 375
ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and 376
buspools. 377
(EEE) "Motorized wheelchair" means any self-propelled 378
vehicle designed for, and used by, a person with a disability 379
and that is incapable of a speed in excess of eight miles per 380
hour. 381
(FFF) "Child care center" and "type A family child care 382
home" have the same meanings as in section 5104.01 of the 383
Revised Code. 384
(GGG) "Multi-wheel agricultural tractor" means a type of 385
agricultural tractor that has two or more wheels or tires on 386
each side of one axle at the rear of the tractor, is designed or 387
used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled machinery, has no 388
provision for carrying loads independently of the drawn vehicles 389
or machinery, and is used principally for agricultural purposes. 390
(HHH) "Operate" means to cause or have caused movement of 391
a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley. 392
(III) "Predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense" means 393
any of the following: 394

H. B. No. 468 Page 15
As Introduced
(1) A violation of section 4511.03, 4511.051, 4511.12, 395
4511.132, 4511.16, 4511.20, 4511.201, 4511.21, 4511.211, 396
4511.213, 4511.22, 4511.23, 4511.25, 4511.26, 4511.27, 4511.28, 397
4511.29, 4511.30, 4511.31, 4511.32, 4511.33, 4511.34, 4511.35, 398
4511.36, 4511.37, 4511.38, 4511.39, 4511.40, 4511.41, 4511.42, 399
4511.43, 4511.431, 4511.432, 4511.44, 4511.441, 4511.451, 400
4511.452, 4511.46, 4511.47, 4511.48, 4511.481, 4511.49, 4511.50, 401
4511.511, 4511.522, 4511.53, 4511.54, 4511.55, 4511.56, 4511.57, 402
4511.58, 4511.59, 4511.60, 4511.61, 4511.64, 4511.66, 4511.661, 403
4511.68, 4511.70, 4511.701, 4511.71, 4511.711, 4511.712, 404
4511.713, 4511.72, 4511.73, 4511.763, 4511.771, 4511.78, or 405
4511.84 of the Revised Code; 406
(2) A violation of division (A)(2) of section 4511.17, 407
divisions (A) to (D) of section 4511.51, or division (A) of 408
section 4511.74 of the Revised Code; 409
(3) A violation of any provision of sections 4511.01 to 410
4511.76 of the Revised Code for which no penalty otherwise is 411
provided in the section that contains the provision violated; 412
(4) A violation of section 4511.214 of the Revised Code; 413
(5) A violation of a municipal ordinance that is 414
substantially similar to any section or provision set forth or 415
described in division (III)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this 416
section. 417
(JJJ) "Road service vehicle" means wreckers, utility 418
repair vehicles, and state, county, and municipal service 419
vehicles equipped with visual signals by means of flashing, 420
rotating, or oscillating lights. 421
(KKK) "Beacon" means a highway traffic signal with one or 422
more signal sections that operate in a flashing mode. 423

H. B. No. 468 Page 16
As Introduced
(LLL) "Hybrid beacon" means a type of beacon that is 424
intentionally placed in a dark mode between periods of operation 425
where no indications are displayed and, when in operation, 426
displays both steady and flashing traffic control signal 427
indications. 428
(MMM) "Highway traffic signal" means a power-operated 429
traffic control device by which traffic is warned or directed to 430
take some specific action. "Highway traffic signal" does not 431
include a power-operated sign, steadily illuminated pavement 432
marker, warning light, or steady burning electric lamp. 433
(NNN) "Median" means the area between two roadways of a 434
divided highway, measured from edge of traveled way to edge of 435
traveled way, but excluding turn lanes. The width of a median 436
may be different between intersections, between interchanges, 437
and at opposite approaches of the same intersection. 438
(OOO) "Private road open to public travel" means a private 439
toll road or road, including any adjacent sidewalks that 440
generally run parallel to the road, within a shopping center, 441
airport, sports arena, or other similar business or recreation 442
facility that is privately owned but where the public is allowed 443
to travel without access restrictions. "Private road open to 444
public travel" includes a gated toll road but does not include a 445
road within a private gated property where access is restricted 446
at all times, a parking area, a driving aisle within a parking 447
area, or a private grade crossing. 448
(PPP) "Shared-use path" means a bikeway outside the 449
traveled way and physically separated from motorized vehicular 450
traffic by an open space or barrier and either within the 451
highway right-of-way or within an independent alignment. A 452
shared-use path also may be used by pedestrians, including 453

H. B. No. 468 Page 17
As Introduced
skaters, joggers, users of manual and motorized wheelchairs, and 454
other authorized motorized and non-motorized users. A shared-use 455
path does not include any trail that is intended to be used 456
primarily for mountain biking, hiking, equestrian use, or other 457
similar uses, or any other single track or natural surface trail 458
that has historically been reserved for nonmotorized use. 459
(QQQ) "Highway maintenance vehicle" means a vehicle used 460
in snow and ice removal or road surface maintenance, including a 461
snow plow, traffic line striper, road sweeper, mowing machine, 462
asphalt distributing vehicle, or other such vehicle designed for 463
use in specific highway maintenance activities. 464
(RRR) "Waste collection vehicle" means a vehicle used in 465
the collection of garbage, refuse, trash, or recyclable 466
materials. 467
(SSS) "Electric bicycle" means a "class 1 electric 468
bicycle," a "class 2 electric bicycle," or a "class 3 electric 469
bicycle" as defined in this section. 470
(TTT) "Class 1 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is 471
equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of 472
less than seven hundred fifty watts that provides assistance 473
only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance 474
when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. 475
(UUU) "Class 2 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is 476
equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of 477
less than seven hundred fifty watts that may provide assistance 478
regardless of whether the rider is pedaling and is not capable 479
of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 480
twenty miles per hour. 481
(VVV) "Class 3 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is 482

H. B. No. 468 Page 18
As Introduced
equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of 483
less than seven hundred fifty watts that provides assistance 484
only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance 485
when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per 486
hour. 487
(WWW) "Low-speed micromobility device" means a device 488
weighing less than one hundred pounds that has handlebars, is 489
propelled by an electric motor or human power, and has an 490
attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than 491
twenty miles per hour when propelled by the electric motor. 492
(XXX) "Natural resources officer" means an officer 493
appointed pursuant to section 1501.24 of the Revised Code. 494
(YYY) "Wildlife officer" means an officer designated 495
pursuant to section 1531.13 of the Revised Code. 496
Section 2. That existing section 4511.01 of the Revised 497
Code is hereby repealed. 498
Section 3. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 499
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 500
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 501
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 502
2024 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2025. 503
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 504
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 505
Section 4. 506
507
1 2 3 4 5
A EPA ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY

H. B. No. 468 Page 19
As Introduced
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 715406 Emergency Response $0 $1,315,000
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $0 $1,315,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $0 $1,315,000
Emergency Response 508
The foregoing appropriation item 715406, Emergency 509
Response, shall be used to purchase and upgrade equipment used 510
by the Office of Emergency Response. 511
Section 5. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 512
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 513
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 514
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 515
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 516
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 517
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 518
applicable provisions of, H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly. 519